Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1012
Charitable administration, defined.

Charitable administration means the performance of any or all of the practices of cosmetology or nail technology without compensation for the benefit of charitable purposes or organizations.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-347;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 274.